Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.050

Vouchers for pay of employees—Warrants.

The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate shall prepare vouchers for the state treasurer for sums covering amounts due officers and employees of the legislature on presentation of certificates signed by the speaker or president, and countersigned by the chief clerk or secretary of the body in which the service of the officer or employee is rendered, and showing amounts due to dates specified. The state treasurer shall issue warrants which shall be drawn in favor and be made payable to the order of the officer or employee named in each certificate.

[ 1973 c 106 s 18; 1890 p 3 s 1; RRS s 8148.]